Utah, session 2026, HB550.
Section 1. Section 72-21-101 is enacted to read:21. Commuter Rail System Electrification 72-21-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Commuter rail" means the same as that term is defined in Section 63N-3-602.(2)"Electrification infrastructure" means overhead catenary systems, substations, and related equipment necessary to supply electric power to commuter rail vehicles.(3)"Hybrid-electric" means a commuter rail vehicle capable of operating using electric power supplied by overhead catenary or third-rail infrastructure and onboard battery storage, without reliance on diesel propulsion during normal operations.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-21-102 is enacted to read:72-21-102. Commuter rail electrification -- Hybrid-electric transition.(1)The department shall lead and coordinate the statewide transition of commuter rail service to hybrid-electric operation.(2)Before January 1, 2031, the department, in coordination with a large public transit district, shall:(a)convert each existing commuter rail vehicle to hybrid-electric operation or replace each existing commuter rail vehicle with a hybrid-electric commuter rail vehicle; and(b)install and operate the electrification infrastructure needed for hybrid-electric commuter rail vehicle operation.(3)Beginning July 1, 2027, a large public transit district may not place a commuter rail vehicle into service unless the vehicle is hybrid-electric.(4)The department may implement this section in phases by corridor or service segment to ensure continuity of commuter rail service.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.